Maine, session 132, LD627.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 24-A MRSA §4320-W is enacted to read:
§4320-W. Coverage for glucagon-like peptide-1 receptor agonist medication
1. Glucagon-like peptide-1 receptor agonist medication defined. For the purposes
of this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, "glucagon-like peptide-1 receptor
agonist medication" means a glucagon-like peptide-1 receptor agonist medication approved
by the federal Food and Drug Administration.
2. Required coverage. A carrier offering a health plan in this State shall provide
coverage for glucagon-like peptide-1 receptor agonist medication that is prescribed by a
health care provider for administration to an enrollee.
3. Limit on out-of-pocket costs. A carrier that provides coverage for prescription
glucagon-like peptide-1 receptor agonist medication may not impose any deductible,
copayment, coinsurance or other cost-sharing requirement on an enrollee for that coverage
that results in out-of-pocket costs to the enrollee that exceed $35 per prescription for a 30-
day supply of covered prescription medications under this section, regardless of the amount
of glucagon-like peptide-1 receptor agonist medication needed to fill the enrollee's
prescriptions.
4. Prior authorization prohibited. A carrier may not make coverage without cost
sharing as required by subsection 3 dependent on any prior authorization requirement.
Sec. 2. Education campaign. By November 1, 2025, the Department of
Professional and Financial Regulation, Bureau of Insurance shall implement a campaign to
educate the public and health care providers regarding the coverage requirements under the
Maine Revised Statutes, Title 24-A, section 4320-W and the health benefits associated with
the use of glucagon-like peptide-1 receptor agonist medication.
Sec. 3. Application. That section of this Act that enacts the Maine Revised Statutes,
Title 24-A, section 4320-W applies to all policies, contracts and certificates executed,
delivered, issued for delivery, continued or renewed in this State on or after January 1,
2026. For purposes of this Act, all contracts are deemed to be renewed no later than the
next yearly anniversary of the contract date.